New York, session 2025-2026, S2412.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 27-0107 of the 2 environmental conservation law, as added by chapter 70 of the laws of 3 1988, subparagraph (i) as amended by chapter 551 of the laws of 2021, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 (b) The local solid waste management plan shall: 6 (i) characterize the solid waste stream to be managed in the planning 7 period and methods to increase waste diversion including, but not limit- 8 ed to recycling and composting; 9 (ii) assess existing and alternate proposed solid waste management 10 programs and facilities; 11 (iii) address to the maximum extent practicable the comments and views 12 expressed by concerned governmental, environmental, commercial and 13 industrial interests and the public on the waste reduction, recycling, 14 reuse and disposal alternatives; 15 (iv) identify the parties with responsibility to implement each 16 element of the plan and the steps which must be undertaken by each; 17 (v) set forth a timetable for implementing the plan; 18 (vi) describe the participation in the preparation of the plan of each 19 municipality which has chosen to participate in such preparation; [and] 20 (vii) describe (A) measures undertaken by the municipalities partic- 21 ipating in the planning unit to secure participation of neighboring 22 jurisdictions, (B) the limitations, if any, imposed by the proposed plan 23 on solid waste management alternatives available to such neighboring EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06498-01-5 S. 2412 2 1 jurisdictions, and (C) alternatives which would be available if a local 2 solid waste management plan including such jurisdictions were prepared. 3 Specific written suggestions received from neighboring jurisdictions 4 shall be summarized and reflected in the plan; and 5 (viii) in a city with a population of one million or more, a plan for 6 the control of litter, including provisions for the placement of an 7 adequate number of receptacles for trash and recyclables located in 8 commercial and business districts as determined by the sanitation 9 commissioner of such city, and public recreational areas such as parks, 10 zoos and botanical gardens as determined in conjunction with the parks 11 commissioner of such city. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amend- 14 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 15 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 16 completed on or before such date.